Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.050

Approval required—Modification.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5014-S.SL) ***

If voting systems or devices or vote tallying systems are to be used for conducting a primary or election, only those that have the approval of the secretary of state or had been approved under this chapter or the former chapter 29.34 RCW before March 22, 1982, may be used. Any modification, change, or improvement to any voting system or component of a system that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity or extend its function, may be made without reexamination or reapproval by the secretary of state under RCW 29A.12.020.

[ 2003 c 111 s 305; 1990 c 59 s 21; 1982 c 40 s 4. Formerly RCW 29.33.081.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Severability—1982 c 40: See note following RCW 29A.12.020.